Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska60-6,274
Terms, defined.

For purposes of sections 60-6,274 to 60-6,277:

(1) Radar transmission device shall mean any mechanism designed to interfere with the reception of radio microwaves in the electromagnetic spectrum, which microwaves, commonly referred to as radar, are employed by law enforcement officials to measure the speed of motor vehicles;

(2) Possession shall mean to have a radar transmission device in a motor vehicle if such device is not (a) disconnected from all power sources and (b) in the rear trunk, which shall include the spare tire compartment, or any other compartment which is not accessible to the driver or any other person in the vehicle while such vehicle is in operation. If no such compartment exists in a vehicle, then such device must be disconnected from all power sources and be placed in a position not readily accessible to the driver or any other person in the vehicle; and

(3) Transceiver shall mean an apparatus contained in a single housing, functioning alternately as a radio transmitter and receiver.

Laws 1982, LB 32, § 2;

R.S.1943, (1988), § 39-6,206;

Laws 1993, LB 370, § 370.